Arkansas, session 2025, HB1591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY.
(a) Effective January 1, 2027, the offices of treasurer and tax
collector in Arkansas County, Arkansas, shall be one (1) office.
(b) At the 2026 general election, the electors of Arkansas County
shall elect one (1) individual to serve as both the treasurer and the tax
collector, and the officer so elected shall take office on January 1, 2027.
(c) The treasurer and the tax collector in Arkansas County shall give
bond for the faithful performance of his or her duties as provided by law.
(d) The treasurer and the tax collector of Arkansas County shall
receive compensation that shall be determined by the Arkansas County Quorum
Court within the minimum and maximum compensation range prescribed by the
General Assembly and shall hire deputies and have other allowances as
prescribed by the Arkansas County Quorum Court.





*SSS185*
02/25/2025 2:18:35 PM SSS185